Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.370

Expert appointed by arbitral tribunal.

(1) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral tribunal:

(a) May appoint one or more experts to report to it on specific issues to be determined by the arbitral tribunal; and

(b) May require a party to give the expert any relevant information or to produce, or to provide access to, any relevant documents, goods, or other property for the expert's inspection.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, if a party so requests or if the arbitral tribunal considers it necessary, the expert shall, after delivery of the expert's written or oral report, participate in a hearing where the parties have the opportunity to put questions to the expert and to present expert witnesses in order to testify on the points at issue.

[ 2015 c 276 s 37.]